Massachusetts, session 194th, S1580.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Notwithstanding any special or general law to the contrary, the department of public
health shall promulgate regulations to define “resident representative” in accordance with federal
law for purposes of providing standards and licensure requirements for long-term care facilities
under chapter 111. The department shall require each licensed long-term care facility to notify
each resident verbally and in writing that said resident has the right to choose a representative
and that said representative is permitted to accompany the resident to care plan meetings and
further support said resident in decision-making as it pertains to their care. The term “resident
representative” shall include, but not be limited to, the following:
of 2

(1) An individual chosen by the resident to act on behalf of the resident in order to
support the resident in decision-making; access medical, social or other personal information of
the resident; manage financial matters; or receive notifications;
(2) A person authorized by state or federal law (including but not limited to agents under
power of attorney, representative payees, and other fiduciaries) to act on behalf of the resident in
order to support the resident in decision-making; access medical, social or other personal
information of the resident; manage financial matters; or receive notifications;
(3) Legal representative, as used in section 712 of the Older Americans Act; or
(4) For residents adjudicated to lack capacity, the court-appointed guardian or
conservator of a resident to give informed consent.
Nothing in this Act shall expand the scope of authority of any resident representative
beyond that authority specifically authorized by the resident, federal law, or a court of competent
jurisdiction.
of 2